Utah statutes.
9-7-511.   Library bonds -- Issuance of previously voted bonds.
(1)  When an election has been held in any county to authorize bonds of the
county for the purpose of acquiring, improving, and extending a public library
for the county, including the acquisition of equipment, furnishings, and
books, and it was specified in the proposition that the bonds are to be
payable from ad valorem taxes to be levied on all taxable property in the
county, and when the election has carried, but none of the bonds authorized
have been issued, the bonds authorized to be issued at election may be issued
and shall be payable from taxes to be levied without limitation as to rate or
amount on all taxable property in the county, despite any provision of law to
the contrary in effect at the time of the election.
(2)  All county library bonds that have been authorized but not yet issued,
all county library bond elections previously held and carried, and all
proceedings in connection with them that were adopted for the authorization of
the bonds are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, and the
bonds, when issued in accordance with the election and proceedings, shall be
binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of the county issuing them
in accordance with their terms.
